Florida, session 2026, HB971.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb971-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 971 2026
Section 1. Section 26.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
26.20 Availability of judge for hearings.—At least one
circuit judge in each circuit must be available at all times to
hold and conduct hearings with limited notice. In each circuit,
there must be at least one judge available on Saturdays,
Sundays, holidays, and after hours on weekdays to hear motions
for a temporary injunction ex parte in domestic violence cases
and motions to enforce time-sharing orders issued or agreements
entered into pursuant to s. 61.13 or s. 742.031. The chief judge
shall may assign a judge for this purpose.
Section 2. Subsection (10) is added to section 61.13,
Florida Statutes, to read:
61.13 Support of children; parenting and time-sharing;
powers of court.—
(10) The following time-sharing matters must be accorded
priority on the court's calendar:
(a) An evidentiary hearing on an initial pleading seeking
temporary parental responsibility and time-sharing schedule not
agreed to by the parties. Each parent must file a proposed
temporary parenting plan with the clerk of the court as part of
his or her initial pleading seeking temporary affirmative
relief. Portions of the proposed temporary parenting plans which
are in agreement with each other must be adopted as a voluntary
agreed schedule between the parents before an evidentiary
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb971-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 971 2026
hearing. Absent good cause, the court shall set a hearing on the
contested issues within 30 days after the pleading is filed. The
court may not refer the parties to mediation as a condition
precedent to the court holding a hearing unless the court has
the consent of both parties. The court shall issue an order on
temporary parental responsibility and time-sharing within 30
days after the evidentiary hearing.
(b) An evidentiary hearing on a motion to enforce
compliance with an existing time-sharing order or agreement. The
court shall set a hearing on a motion seeking to enforce
compliance with an existing time-sharing order or agreement
within 5 business days after the motion is filed. If the judge
assigned to the case is not able to conduct the hearing within 5
business days, a judge who is available pursuant to s. 26.20
must hold the hearing, which may occur during regular business
hours, on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, or after hours on a
weekday.
Section 3. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 742.031,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (2) and (3),
respectively, and subsection (1) and present subsection (2) are
amended to read:
742.031 Hearings; court orders for support, hospital
expenses, and attorney fees.—
(1) Hearings for the purpose of establishing or refuting
the allegations of the complaint and answer must be held in the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb971-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 971 2026
chambers and may be restricted to persons, in addition to the
parties involved and their counsel, as the judge in his or her
discretion may direct. The court shall determine the issues of
paternity of the child and the ability of the parents to support
the child. Each party's social security number must be recorded
in the file containing the adjudication of paternity. If the
court finds that the alleged father is the father of the child,
it must so order. If appropriate, the court may order the father
to pay the complainant, her guardian, or any other person
assuming responsibility for the child moneys sufficient to pay
reasonable attorney fees, hospital or medical expenses, cost of
confinement, and any other expenses incident to the birth of the
child and to pay all costs of the proceeding. Bills for
pregnancy, childbirth, and scientific testing are admissible as
evidence without requiring third-party foundation testimony and
constitute prima facie evidence of amounts incurred for such
services or for testing on behalf of the child. The court shall
order either or both parents owing a duty of support to the
child to pay support under chapter 61. The court must issue,
upon motion by a party, a temporary order requiring child
support for a minor child under s. 61.30 pending an
administrative or judicial determination of parentage if there
is clear and convincing evidence of paternity on the basis of
genetic tests or other evidence. The court shall, upon motion by
100 a party, issue may also make a determination of an appropriate
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb971-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 971 2026
101 parenting plan, including a time-sharing schedule, in accordance
102 with chapter 61.
103 (2) If a judgment of paternity contains only a child
104 support award with no parenting plan or time-sharing schedule,
105 the obligee parent shall receive all of the time-sharing and
106 sole parental responsibility without prejudice to the obligor
107 parent. If a paternity judgment contains no such provisions, the
108 mother shall be presumed to have all of the time-sharing and
109 sole parental responsibility.
110 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb971-00